Nevada, session 83, AB189.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 240 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 2. “Affirmation” means a solemn and formal
declaration, equivalent in nature to an oath, which asserts that a
statement or series of statements is true.
Sec. 3. “Oath” means an outward pledge made by a person,
signifying that the attestation or promise of the person is given
under an immediate sense of responsibility to a higher power or
God. The term includes, without limitation, any form of attestation
by which a person signifies his or her obligation, under
conscience, to perform an act faithfully and truthfully.
Sec. 4. 1. Under any circumstance in which an oath or
affirmation is required for any purpose:
(a) A person may provide either an oath or an affirmation;
and
(b) An oath and an affirmation have the same legal effect.
2. An oath or affirmation may be provided in writing, orally
or by any other equivalent mode of communication, including,
without limitation, a communication mode, as defined in NRS
388.417, in accordance with the circumstances under which the
oath or affirmation is required and in compliance with the
requirements of any law, regulation or rule of procedure
applicable to such circumstances.
3. A notarial officer may administer an oath or affirmation in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter and in
compliance with the requirements of any law, regulation or rule of
procedure applicable to the circumstances under which the oath
or affirmation is administered, including, without limitation, for:
(a) Testimony in a legal proceeding, including, without
limitation, a pretrial hearing, examination, deposition or other
proceeding; or
(b) The assumption of an office or any duties associated with a
position that mandates such a pledge.
Sec. 5. NRS 240.001 is hereby amended to read as follows:
240.001 As used in NRS 240.001 to 240.206, inclusive, and
sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
the words and terms defined in NRS 240.002 to 240.0067, inclusive,
and sections 2 and 3 of this act have the meanings ascribed to them
in those sections.
H
-
*AB189*